Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2,114
Judge; nomination; appointment; retention; vacancy.

All judges of separate juvenile courts shall be nominated, appointed, and retained in office in accordance with the provisions of Article V, section 21, of the Constitution of Nebraska. Each of such judges shall hold office until his or her successor is selected and qualified. Any vacancy in the office of judge of the separate juvenile courts shall be filled by nomination and appointment as provided by Article V, section 21, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 1963, c. 244, § 1, p. 737;

R.S.1943, (1978), § 43-230.01;

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 71.

Judges, retirement, discipline, and general powers, see Chapter 24, article 7.